Utah statutes.
17C-2-301.   Blight study -- Requirements -- Deadline.

(1)  Each blight study required under Subsection 17C-2-102(1)(a)(i)(A) shall:

(a)  undertake a parcel by parcel survey of the survey area;

(b)  provide data so the board and taxing entity committee may determine:

(i)  whether the conditions described in Subsection 17C-2-303(1):

(A)  exist in part or all of the survey area; and

(B)  qualify an area within the survey area as a project area; and

(ii)  whether the survey area contains all or part of a superfund site, an inactive industrial site, or inactive airport site;

(c)  include a written report setting forth:

(i)  the conclusions reached;

(ii)  any recommended area within the survey area qualifying as a project area; and

(iii)  any other information requested by the agency to determine whether an urban renewal project area is feasible; and

(d)  be completed within one year after the adoption of the survey area resolution.

(2) (a)  If a blight study is not completed within one year after the adoption of the resolution under Subsection 17C-2-101(1) designating a survey area, the agency may not approve an urban renewal project area plan based on that blight study unless it first adopts a new resolution under Subsection 17C-2-101(1).

(b)  A new resolution under Subsection (2)(a) shall in all respects be considered to be a resolution under Subsection 17C-2-101(1) adopted for the first time, except that any actions taken toward completing a blight study under the resolution that the new resolution replaces shall be considered to have been taken under the new resolution.

